b/hyph/github/hyph_la_VA.dic
ISO8859-1
.a3b3æq
.a2b1ali
.a2b1auu
.a2b3c
.a2b1eo
.á2b1eo
.a2b1er
.a2b1ér
.á2b1er
.a4b3es
.a4b3és
.a2b1e3u
.á2b1e3u
.a2b1e3ú
.a2b1é3u
.a2bf
.a2b1í
.a2b1ic
.a2b1i2ec
.a2b1i2éc
.a2b3ier
.a2b3iér
.a2b1ig
.á2b3ig
.a2b1ii
.á2b1ii
.a2b1in1
.a2b1ir
.a2b1it
.á2b1it
.a2b1i4u
.a2b1i4ú
.a2b1iv
.a2bj
.a2b3l
.á2b3lu
.a2b1ol
.a2b1ól
.a2b1om
.a2b1or
.a2b1ór
.a2b1ort
.a2b3r
.á2b3r
.a3b4rah
.á3b4rah
.a2b3ru
.ab4s3temi
.ab4s3témi
.ab4s3ten
.ab4s3tén
.ab5s4tent.
.ab4s3terg
.ab4s3térg
.ab4s3terr
.ab4s3térr
.ab4s3ters
.ab4s3térs
.ab4s3tol
.ab4s3tól
.ab4s3trah
.ab4s3tráh
.áb4s3trah
.ab4s3tras
.ab4s3trás
.ab4s3trax
.ab4s3tráx
.ab4s3tru
.ab4s3trú
.áb4s3tru
.ab4s3tu
.ab4s3tú
.áb4s3tu
.absu2b3l
.absú2b3l
.a2b3und
.a2b3únd
.a2b3us
.a2b3ut
.a2b3út
.a2d3
.á2d3
.a3d4æ
.a4d5æq
.a3d4am.
.a3d4amant
.a2d3a3s4cr
.a3d4eps
.ader2
.ade3u
.a2dfu
.adi2a
.ádi2a
.adi2á
.a3d4i3ab
.a3d4i3áb
.adi2e
.adi2é
.adi3en
.adi3én
.adi2o
.ádi2o
.a3d4ip
.a3d4íp
.á3d4ip
.a4d5ipisc
.a4d5ipísc
.ad5is.
.ad5it.
.ad3i2u
.ad3i2ú
.ádi2u
.ado2b3
.adó2b3
.a4d3ole
.a3d4on
.a3d4ón
.a3d4ramy
.a3d4ran
.a3d4rán
.á3d4ran
.ad3s2cr
.ad3si
.a2d5s2t
.á2d5s2tr
.adsu3e
.a3d4u3a
.a3d4u3á
.a4d5ul
.a3d4urn
.a3d4y
.a3d4ý
.á3d4y
.alte3r
.alté3r
.álte3r
.alte4rc
.alté4rc
.alte4rn
.alté4rn
.alte4rp
.alté4rp
.alte4rt
.alté4rt
.alte4r3ut
.alté4r3ut
.alte4r3út
.am2b3a2d3
.am2b3á2d3
.am2b3ag
.ám2b3ag
.am2b3ág
.am2b3arv
.am2b3ax
.am2b3áx
.am2b3ed
.ám2b3ed
.am2b3éd
.am2b3es
.am2b3és
.am2b3i
.ám2b3i
.am2b3í
.am3b4iani
.am3b4iáni
.am3b4iano
.am3b4iáno
.am3b4ianó
.am3b4iatin
.am3b4iatín
.am3b4ibar
.am3b4ibár
.am3b4ic
.am3b4íc
.am3b4id
.ám3b4id
.ambi2ec
.ambi2éc
.am3b4ieg
.am3b4iég
.am3b4if
.am3b4igene
.am3b4igéne
.am3b4igené
.am3b4igenus.
.am3b4ígenus.
.am3b4il
.am3b4íl
.am3b4ima
.am3b4íma
.am3b4iori
.am3b4iorí
.am3b4íori
.am3b4isin
.am3b4iso
.am3b4isó
.am3b4itex
.am3b4itéx
.am3b4itr
.am3b4itut
.am3b4ítut
.am3b4iva
.am3b4ivia
.am3b4ívia
.am3b4ivie
.am3b4ívie
.am3b4ivii
.am3b4ívii
.am3b4ivio
.am3b4ivió
.am3b4ívio
.am3b4iviu
.am3b4íviu
.am3b4ix.
.am2b3ur
.am2b3úr
.am2b3us
.am2b3ús
.ani2m3ad
.ante3u
.anti1
.anti3m2n
.ape3r2u
.ar2ch3ang
.ar2ch3áng
.archi3e
.a3s2c
.á3s2c
.a3s4pu
.a3s4pú
.á3s4pu
.a6s5plen
.a6s5plén
.a6s5purg
.a6s5púrg
.a3s2t
.á3s2t
.a4sthm
.a4s3tr
.á4s3tr
.a5s4trat
.a5s4trát
.a5s4trid
.a5s4tríd
.a5s4tru
.á5s4tru
.a5s4trú
.a6s5trum.
.b2
.be2n1i4a
.bé2n1i4a
.be4th5l
.bé4th5l
.bou6s5tr
.c2
.circu4m1
.circú4m1
.circumam2b3
.circumám2b3
.circumam3b4ul
.circumam3b4úl
.circumám3b4ul
.circume3u
.circume3ú
.circumi2a
.circumi2á
.circumi2e
.circumi2é
.circumi2n3
.circumi2o
.circumi2u
.circumo2b3
.circumó2b3
.circum5s4
.circú4m5s4
.ci2s3
.coa2d3
.coá2d3
.coadi2u
.coadi2ú
.coádi2u
.co1e
.co3e2lec
.co3e2lig
.co3emen
.co2e1n
.co3e2r
.co3e2x3
.coex3s2
.co3g2nos
.co3g2nós
.co1i
.co1i2e
.coi3u
.co2m3ed
.co2m3éd
.có2m3ed
.co2m3es.
.co2m3it
.co2m3ít
.có2m3it
.compe2r3
.compé2r3
.compe3r4en
.compe3r4én
.compe3r4er
.compé3r4er
.compe3r4ér
.compe3r4i
.compé3r4i
.compe3r4í
.compe4r5ib
.compe4r5íb
.compe4r5ier
.compe4r5íer
.compe4r5iér
.compe4r5ii
.compé4r5ii
.compe4r5ií
.compe4r5íi
.compe3r4u
.compe3r4ú
.compo3t4
.cómpo3t4
.compo4t5en
.cómpo4t5en
.compo4t5én
.co2n1
.có2n1
.co3n2a
.co3n2á
.conde3s4p
.co3n2e
.co3n2é
.co3n2i
.co3n2í
.có3n2i
.co4n3i2ac
.co4n3i2ác
.co4n3ic
.co4n3íc
.co4n3i2ec
.co4n3i2éc
.co4n3i2ex
.co4n3i2éx
.co4n3i2u
.co4n3i2ú
.có4n3i2u
.co5n4ium.
.co3n2o
.co3n2ó
.con3s2cr
.cón3s2cr
.con3s4p
.cón3s4p
.co3n2u
.co3n2ú
.cre3u
.cu4ll
.cu4mm
.cu4sp
.cú4sp
.de3es.
.de1í
.dé1i
.de1in
.de1ín
.de1it
.depe4r5
.depé4r5
.dépe4r5
.de3s2c
.de3s4p
.dé3s4p
.de3s2q
.de3s2t
.dé3s2t
.de3u
.de4uc
.de4ul
.de4urio
.de4urío
.de4uter.
.de4utera
.de4uterá
.de4uteræ
.de4uteri
.de4utéri
.de5uteris.
.de5utéris.
.de4utero
.de4uteró
.de4uteru
.dia3s4p
.di3g2nosc
.di3i4u
.di3i4ú
.di3œ
.di2r1im
.di2r1ím
.di5s4ced
.di5s4céd
.di5s4cen
.di5s4cén
.di5s4cep
.di5s4cép
.di5s4cer
.di5s4cér
.di5s4ces
.di5s4cés
.di5s4cid
.di5s4cíd
.di5s4cin
.di5s4cín
.di5s4cip
.di5s4cíp
.di5s4ciss
.di5s4císs
.di5s4cit
.dí5s4cit
.di5s4cr
.di6s5cre
.di6s5cré
.di6s5crim
.di6s5crím
.di6s5cru
.di6s5cruc
.di6s5crúc
.di5s4ert
.di5s4ért
.di2s1i2
.di2s1í2
.disi3c
.disí3c
.di2sj
.dispe2r3
.dispé2r3
.di5s4ta
.di5s4tá
.di5s4till
.di5s4tíll
.di5s4tim
.di5s4tím
.di5s4tin
.di5s4tín
.di6s5tine
.di6s5tíne
.di5s4tir
.di5s4tír
.di5s4to.
.di5s4trar
.di5s4trár
.di5s4trat
.di5s4trát
.di5s4trav
.di5s4tráv
.di3u
.di3ú
.dy6s5p6n
.ei5on
.ele3usa
.ele3usæ
.epi5s4tr
.epi5s4ty
.epi5s4tý
.e2t3en
.é2t3en
.e2t3i3am
.é2t3i3am
.e2t3i3ám
.e3u3ax.
.e3ú3ax.
.eu3s2tom
.eu3s2tóm
.eu3s2ty
.eu3s2tý
.e2x3
.é2x3
.exam2b3i
.exam2b3í
.exám2b3i
.e3x4ed
.é3x4ed
.e3x4éd
.e3x4eget
.e3x4egét
.exo2b3
.exó2b3
.e3x4od
.é3x4od
.e3x4ód
.e3x4orc
.e3x4ost
.e3x4óst
.ex5s4c
.éx5s4c
.ex3s4p
.éx3s4p
.ex5s2t
.éx5s2t
.f2
.g2
.gai4
.h2
.he3i.
.hi2e
.hi2é
.hucu4s
.hu1i2u
.hu1i2ú
.i4a
.i4á
.iai2u
.i3bi
.i3bí
.i3bo
.i3bó
.i3bu
.i3bú
.i3co
.i3có
.i2d1eo.
.í2d1eo.
.i2d1ipsum.
.i2d1ípsum.
.i2e
.i2é
.iei2u
.i3i
.i3í
.í3i
.i4n3
.í4n3
.ina2b3r
.inab3s2
.ina2cr
.ina2df
.i3n2an
.i3n2án
.incircu4m
.incon5s4tr
.incón5s4tr
.in4d3ep
.in4d3ép
.in4d3ig
.ín4d3ig
.in5d4ign
.in5d4ígn
.in4d3ipis
.in4d3ipís
.in5d4is
.in4d3u
.ín4d3u
.in4d3ú
.in5d4u.
.in5d4ub
.in5d4úb
.in5d4uc
.in5d4úc
.in6d5ucul
.in6d5úcul
.in5d4ug
.in5d4ul
.in5d4úl
.in5d4up
.in5d4ur
.in5d4úr
.ín5d4ur
.in5d4us.
.in5d4u5s4tr
.in5d4ú5s4tr
.in5d4utiæ
.in5d4útiæ
.in5d4utia
.in5d4utiá
.in5d4útia
.in5d4utii
.in5d4útii
.in5d4utio
.in5d4utió
.in5d4ux
.in5d4úx
.i3n2ers
.i3n2ert
.ine2x3
.inexs2t
.infra3s4
.ini2e
.ini2é
.i3n2it
.ini2u
.ini2ú
.ino2b3
.inó2b3
.inobi6ur
.inpe2r3iur
.in3s4cr
.in3s4p
.ín3s4p
.in5s2t
.ín5s2t
.inte2r3
.inté2r3
.ínte2r3
.inte3r4a
.inte3r4á
.ínte3r4a
.inte4r5amn
.inte4r5anh
.inte4r5ap
.inte4r5áp
.inte4r5aresc
.inte4r5arésc
.inte3r4em.
.ínte3r4em.
.inte3r4emini.
.inte3r4émini.
.inte3r4emur.
.inte3r4émur.
.inte3r4emus.
.inte3r4émus.
.inte3r4ent
.ínte3r4ent
.inte3r4ént
.inte3r4er.
.ínte3r4er.
.inte3r4ere.
.inte3r4ére.
.inté3r4ere.
.inte3r4éris.
.inte3r4et
.ínte3r4et
.inte3r4ét
.inte2r1i2ac
.inte2r1i2ác
.inté2r1i2ac
.inte2r1i2ec
.inte2r1i2éc
.inte3r4io
.inte3r4ió
.inté3r4io
.inte2r1i2un
.inte2r1i2ún
.inte3r4ius.
.inté3r4ius.
.inte3r4o.
.ínte3r4o.
.inte3r4or.
.ínte3r4or.
.inter3s4p
.inter5s4t
.intér5s4t
.inte3r4ul
.inte3r4úl
.inté3r4ul
.intran2s1
.intro3i3e
.intro3i3é
.inu2a
.inu2e
.inu2i
.i5n4ul
.í5n4ul
.i5n4úl
.i6n5ulc
.i6n5úlc
.i6n5ult
.i6n5últ
.inu2o
.inu2u
.i2o
.i2ó
.i4u
.i4ú
.i5ul
.i5úl
.i6uli
.i6úli
.i7uli.
.i7úli.
.i7ulid
.i7úlid
.i7ulis.
.i7úlis.
.iu2s3i2ur
.j2
.l2
.langu4ere.
.langu4ére.
.langu4eri.
.langu4éri.
.la4u
.lecti5s4t
.lon2g1an
.lon2g1án
.lu4x3q
.lu3x2u
.lu3x2ú
.m2
.mai4u
.n2
.ne2c1op
.ne2c1óp
.ne2g1ot
.ne2g1ót
.ne3ut
.né3ut
.o2b3
.ó2b3
.o3b4el
.ó3b4el
.obi2ac
.obi2ác
.obi2ec
.obi2éc
.o3b4il
.o3b4íl
.obi2ur
.obi2úr
.o3b4ol
.ó3b4ol
.o4b5ole
.o4b5olé
.ó4b5ole
.o3b4rim
.o3b4russ
.o3b4rúss
.o3b4ryz
.o3b4rýz
.ob3s2q
.ob5st
.ób5st
.ob6s3trud
.ob6s3trúd
.ob6s3trus
.ob6s3trús
.p2
.pæ2n3ins
.pæ2n3íns
.para1i
.para1u
.par3s4tr
.pe1i6or
.pe1i6ór
.pe3r2a.
.pe2r1a
.pe2r1á
.pé2r1a
.pe2r1a2b1i2
.pe2r1a2d1
.pe3r2am.
.pe3r2arum.
.pe3r2árum.
.pe3r2as.
.pe3r2at
.pe3r2át
.pe4r3att
.pe4r3átt
.pe2r1coq
.pe2r1cu
.pe2r3ea
.pe2r3eám
.pé2r3eam
.pé2r3eant
.pe2r3eát
.pé2r3eat
.pe2r3eas
.pé2r3eas
.pe4r3ec
.pe4r1ed
.pe2r1eff
.pe2r3ég
.pe2r3eg
.pe6r3egr
.pé6r3egr
.pe2r1el
.pe2r1em
.pe2r1ém
.pe4r3enn
.pe4r3énn
.pe2r3eo
.pé2r3eo
.pe4r3err
.pe4r3érr
.pe2r1eru
.pe2r3es.
.pe4r1e2x3
.pe2r3h
.pé2r3h
.pe2r3i1
.pe2r3í1
.pe3r4ia
.pe3r4iá
.pe2r1i2ac
.pe3r4ian
.pe2r3ib
.pe2r3íb
.pe3r4icl
.pe3r4ícl
.pe3r4icu
.pe3r4ícu
.pe2r3ie
.pe2r3íe
.pe2r3ié
.pe3r4ieb
.pe3r4iéb
.pe3r4iem
.pe3r4iém
.pe3r4ien
.pe3r4ién
.pe4r5iens
.pé4r5iens
.pe3r4ier
.pe3r4íer
.pe3r4iér
.pe4r5iera
.pé4r5iera
.pe4r5íera
.pe5r6ierat
.pé5r6ierat
.pe5r6íerat
.perie3i
.pe3r4iet
.pe3r4iét
.perié3i
.períe3i
.pe2r1i2ec
.pé2r3ii
.pe3r4ileu
.pe3r4iléu
.pe4r3im
.pe4r3ím
.pé4r3im
.pe5r4imed
.pe5r4imi
.pe5r4ími
.pe5r4imu
.pe5r4ímu
.pe6r5imus
.pe6r5ímus
.pe2r3in
.pe2r3ín
.pe3r4int
.pe3r4ínt
.pe3r4io
.pe3r4iod
.pe3r4íod
.pe3r4iód
.pe5r4ip
.pe2r3ir
.pe5r4irr
.pe3r4iremur
.pe3r4irémur
.pe3r4iremi
.pe3r4irémi
.pe3r4irentur
.pe3r4iréntur
.pe3r4irer
.pe3r4irér
.pe3r4írer
.pe3r4iret
.pe3r4irét
.pe4r5iret.
.pe4r5iretis
.pe4r5irétis
.pe3r4iri
.pe3r4íri
.pe3r4i3s2c
.pe3r4í3s2c
.pe5r4isseu
.pe5r4isséu
.pe3r4i3st
.pe3r4í3st
.pe3r4it
.pe3r4ít
.pe4r5itúr
.pe4r5itur
.pe4r5ítur
.pe4r5it.
.pe4r5itote
.pe4r5itóte
.pe2r3i4u
.pé2r3i4u
.pe2r3i4ú
.pe3r4i5un
.pe3r4i5ún
.pe4r3j
.pé4r3j
.pe2r1o2b
.pe2r1od
.pe2r1of
.pe2r1ol
.pe2r1op
.pe4r3or
.pe4r3ór
.pe2r3reg
.pe2r3s2c
.pe2r3s2t
.pé2r3s2t
.pe2r3tran2s1
.pe2r3trán2s1
.pe2r3u
.pe2r3ú
.pe2r1u2a
.pe2r1u2e
.pe2r1u2i
.pe3r4ul
.pe3r4úl
.pe2r1u2o
.po3et
.pos4t3ea
.pos4t3eá
.pós4t3ea
.pos4t3er
.pos4t3ér
.pós4t3er
.pos5t4erg
.pos4t3h
.po4s4t3hac
.pos4t3il
.pos4t3íl
.posu3í
.pósu3i
.po3t4ent.
.po3t4entur.
.po3t4éntur.
.po3t4er.
.po3t4ere.
.po3t4ére.
.po3t4éris.
.po2t3ue
.po2t3ui
.po2t3úe
.po2t3úi
.po2t3ué
.po2t3uí
.pó2t3ui
.præ1
.præ3a2u
.præ3es
.præe2x1
.præé2x1
.præi4a
.præi4á
.præi4ec
.præin3s4t
.præín3s4t
.præi4o
.præi4u
.præi4ú
.præpo3t4ent.
.præpo3t4entur.
.præpo3t4éntur.
.præpo3t4er.
.præpó3t4er.
.præpo3t4ere.
.præpo3t4ére.
.præpo3t4éris.
.præpó3t4es.
.præpo2t3ue
.præpo2t3úe
.præpo2t3ué
.præpo2t3ui
.præpo2t3úi
.præpo2t3uí
.præpó2t3ui
.præ3s2c
.præ5s2t
.prǽ5s2t
.præte2r3
.præté2r3
.prǽte2r3
.præte3r4a
.præte3r4á
.prǽte3r4a
.præte4r5ac
.præte4r5ác
.præte4r5ag
.præte4r5ág
.præte3r4e.
.prǽte3r4e.
.præte3r4eb
.præte3r4éb
.præte3r4em
.præte3r4ém
.præte3r4en
.prǽte3r4en
.præte3r4én
.præte3r4ere
.præté3r4ere
.præte3r4ére
.præte3r4eré
.præte3r4et
.præte3r4ét
.prǽte3r4et
.præte3r4imini.
.præte3r4ímini.
.præte3r4imur.
.præté3r4imur.
.præte3r4itor.
.præté3r4itor.
.præte3r4o.
.prǽte3r4o.
.præte3r4or.
.prǽte3r4or.
.præte3r4unt
.præte3r4únt
.prǽte3r4unt
.primi1
.primi3s2c
.pro2d1ac
.pro2d1ác
.pro2d1amb
.pro2d1ámb
.pro2d1e
.pro2d1é
.pró2d1e
.pro3d2e.
.pro3d2eamb
.pro3d2eámb
.pro3d2eb
.pro3d2éb
.pro3d2ec
.pro3d2ef
.pro3d2em
.pro3d2ém
.pro3d2en
.pro3d2én
.pro3d2ere
.pro3d2ére
.pro3d2eré
.pró3d2ere
.pro3d2éris.
.prod3es.
.pro3d2et
.pro3d2ét
.pro2d1ib
.pro2d1íb
.pro2d1ie
.pró2d1ie
.pro2d1íe
.pro2d1ié
.pro2d1ig
.pró2d1ig
.pro2d1íg
.pro2d1ii
.pró2d1ii
.pro2d1íi
.pro2d1ií
.pro2d1ímus.
.pro2d1ir
.pro2d1ír
.pro2d1íte.
.pro2d1ítis.
.pro2d1íto.
.pro2d1ítur.
.pro2d1iv
.pro2d1ív
.pro3g2n
.pro3i4e
.pro3i4é
.pro3in
.propte2r3
.propté2r3
.pro3s2c
.pro6s5para
.pro5s2t
.pro5s4tan
.pro5s4tar
.pro4s3tit
.pro3u
.pseu2d3a
.pseudoco2m1
.pseudo3s4
.pseudó3s4
.pseudo4s5t
.pseudó4s5t
.p4t
.pulei4
.puléi4
.qua2m3o2b3
.quá2m3o2b3
.quattuo2r3
.que2m3a2d3m
.que2m3á2d3m
.quin2c3un
.quoa2d3usq
.quoa2d3úsq
.quo6d5l
.quo6n3iam
.quó6n3iam
.quo2t1an
.quo2t1án
.quo2t1enn
.quo2t1énn
.quo2t3li
.quó2t3li
.r2
.ra2y
.reco2n3i2u
.reco2n3i2ú
.re2d1ac
.re2d1ác
.re2d1ad
.re2d1ád
.re2d1am
.re2d1ám
.ré2d1am
.re3d4amn
.re3d4ámn
.re2d1an
.re2d1án
.re2d1ar
.re2d1ár
.re3d4ari
.re3d4ári
.re2d1a2u
.re2d1á2u
.re2d1ea
.ré2d1ea
.re2d1eá
.re2d1eg
.re2d1ég
.re2d1em
.re2d1ém
.re2d1eo
.ré2d1eo
.re2d1e3u
.re2d1e3ú
.ré2d1e3u
.re2d1h
.re2d1i.
.re2d1ib
.re2d1íb
.re3d2ic
.re2d1ien
.ré2d1ien
.re2d1ier
.re2d1íer
.re2d1iér
.re2d1ii
.ré2d1ii
.re2d1íi
.re2d1ií
.re2d1ig
.ré2d1ig
.re2d1im
.re2d1ím
.ré2d1im
.re4d3imi
.re2d1in
.re2d1ín
.redin2d3
.re2d1ir
.re2d1ír
.re2d5is
.re2d5it
.re2d5ít
.ré2d5it
.re2d1iv
.re2d1ív
.re2d1ol
.re2d1ól
.ré2d1ol
.re2d1op
.re2d1óp
.re2d1ord
.re2d1órd
.re3d2orm
.re2d1orn
.re2d1órn
.re2d1ul
.re2d1úl
.re2d1un
.re2d1ún
.re2d1uv
.re2d1úv
.ree2x
.re1ie
.re3i2ec
.re1in
.re3ips
.re3ite
.repa2u
.re3s2cr
.re3s2cu
.re3s2cú
.re3s4p
.ré3s4p
.re6s5pub
.re6s5púb
.re5s4ta
.re5s4tá
.re5s2tag
.re5s4ta2u
.re5s2ter
.re5s2tér
.re5s2tib
.re5s2tíb
.re5s2tic
.re6s3ticu
.re5s2til
.re5s2tíl
.re5s2tin
.re5s2tín
.re5s2tip
.re5s2típ
.ré5s4tit
.re5s4tit
.re5s4tít
.re5s2to
.re5s4tr
.ré5s4tr
.retran2s1
.retrán2s1
.re3ul
.re3um
.rhe4u.
.s2
.sa2t1ag
.sa2t1ág
.sati2s1
.sa3ul.
.se2d1it
.se2d1ít
.seme2t3ip
.semiam2b3
.semi3s4p
.se2m3un
.se2m3us
.se3s4cen
.ses2c1u4n
.si2c1ut
.sí2c1ut
.si3s2ten
.s2m
.sta3g2n
.su2b3
.sú2b3
.subam2b3
.su3b4ia.
.sú3b4ia.
.subi4ac
.subi4ác
